District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1205.04

Transfers.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 224, 46 DCR 6373
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 138, 52 DCR 10637

Cross References

Financial institutions, licensing of money lenders, “community development corporation” defined, see § 26-910.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 224 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).